North Carolina statutes. Chapter 32A. Powers of Attorney.
Article 2B. Gifts Authorized by Court Order.

§§ 32A-14.10 through 32A-14.12.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

History.

G.S. 32A-14.10; 1995, c. 331, s. 5; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-14.11; 1995, c. 331, s. 5; 1999-216, s. 7; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-14.12; 1995, c. 331, s. 5; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

Cross References.

For similar current provisions, see the North Carolina Uniform Power of Attorney Act,

G.S. 32C-1-101

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Former G.S. 32A-14.10 pertained to gifts authorized by court order. Former G.S. 32A-14.11 pertained to appeal; stay effected by appeal. Former G.S. 32A-14.12 pertained to costs and fees.